Maryland, session 2025, HB0894.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–2A–05.
(a) (1) Except with respect to species of wildlife or plants determined to be
endangered or threatened pursuant to the Endangered Species Act, the Secretary, upon the
petition of an interested person that meets the requirements of paragraph (2) of this
subsection, shall conduct a review of any listed or unlisted species proposed to be removed
from or added to the lists published pursuant to § 10–2A–04(f) of this subtitle, if the
Secretary publishes public notice that the person has presented substantial evidence which
warrants a review.
– 1 –

Ch. 551 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A petition submitted by an interested person under paragraph (1) of
this subsection shall include:
(i) A description of the biological distribution of the species in the
State;
(ii) The life needs and habitat requirements of the species;
(iii) Evidence:
1. Of the species’ decline, if the species is an unlisted species;
or
2. That the species is more common than previously believed
and documented, if the species is a listed species;
(iv) All known threats that jeopardize the continued existence of the
species;
(v) Any other relevant biological and ecological data or other life
history information pertinent to the status of the species;
(vi) Evidence that the species is recognized as a valid species, or
infraspecific taxa of regional or national significance; and
(vii) Adequate documentation that the species occurs naturally and is
permanently established in the State.
(b) (1) When any species of wildlife or plant is listed as a threatened species
pursuant to § 10–2A–04(f) of this subtitle, the Secretary shall adopt regulations necessary
and advisable to provide for the conservation of the species.
(2) The Secretary, by regulations, may prohibit with respect to any
threatened species of wildlife or plant any act prohibited under subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section and [§ 10–2A–05.1] §§
10–2A–05.1, 10–2A–05.2, AND 10–2A–05.3 of this subtitle, with respect to any
endangered species of wildlife, a person may not:
(1) Export the species from the State;
(2) Take the species within the State;
(3) Possess, process, sell or offer for sale, deliver, carry, transport, or ship
the species by any means; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 551
(4) Violate any regulation pertaining to the conservation of the species or
to any threatened species of wildlife listed pursuant to this subsection and adopted by the
Secretary pursuant to authority provided by this section.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, with respect to any
endangered species of plant, a person may not:
(1) Export the species from the State;
(2) Possess, process, sell, offer for sale, deliver, carry, transport, or ship the
species by any means; or
(3) Violate any regulation pertaining to the species or to any threatened
species of plant listed pursuant to § 10–2A–04(f) of this subtitle and adopted by the
Secretary.
(e) Any endangered species of wildlife or plant which enters the State from
another state or from a point outside the territorial limits of the United States and which
is transported to a point within or beyond the State may enter and be transported without
restriction in accordance with the terms of any federal permit or permit issued under the
laws or regulations of another state.
(f) The Secretary may permit, under the terms and conditions that the Secretary
prescribes, any act otherwise prohibited by subsections (c) and (d) of this section for
scientific purposes or to enhance the propagation or survival of the affected species.
10–2A–05.2.
(a) The Secretary may issue a permit to an applicant that authorizes an
incidental taking of the endangered Delmarva fox squirrel if:
(1) The applicant submits a conservation plan to the Department that
specifies:
(i) The impact that will likely result from the incidental taking;
(ii) The steps that the applicant will take to minimize and mitigate
the impact;
(iii) The funding that will be available to implement the steps;
(iv) The alternative actions to the incidental taking that the
applicant considered and the reasons that the alternatives were not used; and
(v) Any other measures that the Secretary requires as being
necessary or appropriate for the purposes of the plan; and
– 3 –

Ch. 551 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The Secretary finds that:
(i) The incidental taking will not appreciably reduce the likelihood
of the survival or recovery of the Delmarva fox squirrel in the wild;
(ii) The applicant will, to the extent practicable, minimize and
mitigate the impacts of the incidental taking;
(iii) Adequate funding for the conservation plan is available and the
plan will be implemented; and
(iv) The applicant has obtained the required federal authorization for
the incidental taking of the Delmarva fox squirrel.
(b) The Secretary may adopt regulations to implement and enforce this section.
10–2A–05.3.
(A) THE SECRETARY MAY ISSUE A PERMIT TO AN APPLICANT THAT
AUTHORIZES AN INCIDENTAL TAKING OF THE INDIANA BAT, THE NORTHERN
LONG–EARED BAT, AND THE TRICOLOR BAT THE TRICOLORED BAT, OR THE EASTERN
SMALL–FOOTED BAT IF:
(1) THE APPLICANT SUBMITS A CONSERVATION PLAN TO THE
DEPARTMENT THAT SPECIFIES:
(I) THE IMPACT THAT WILL LIKELY RESULT FROM THE
INCIDENTAL TAKING;
(II) THE STEPS THAT THE APPLICANT WILL TAKE TO MINIMIZE
AND MITIGATE THE IMPACT;
(III) THE FUNDING THAT WILL BE AVAILABLE TO IMPLEMENT
THE STEPS;
(IV) THE ALTERNATIVE ACTIONS TO THE INCIDENTAL TAKING
THAT THE APPLICANT CONSIDERED AND THE REASONS THAT THE ALTERNATIVES
WERE NOT USED; AND
(V) ANY OTHER MEASURES THAT THE SECRETARY REQUIRES
AS BEING NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE PLAN; AND
(2) THE SECRETARY FINDS THAT:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 551
(I) THE INCIDENTAL TAKING WILL NOT APPRECIABLY REDUCE
THE LIKELIHOOD OF THE SURVIVAL OR RECOVERY OF THE INDIANA BAT, THE
NORTHERN LONG–EARED BAT, AND THE TRICOLOR BAT THE TRICOLORED BAT, OR
THE EASTERN SMALL–FOOTED BAT IN THE WILD;
(II) THE APPLICANT WILL, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE,
MINIMIZE AND MITIGATE THE IMPACTS OF THE INCIDENTAL TAKING;
(III) ADEQUATE FUNDING FOR THE CONSERVATION PLAN IS
AVAILABLE AND THE PLAN WILL BE IMPLEMENTED; AND
(IV) THE APPLICANT HAS OBTAINED THE REQUIRED FEDERAL
AUTHORIZATION FOR THE INCIDENTAL TAKING OF THE INDIANA BAT, THE
NORTHERN LONG–EARED BAT, AND THE TRICOLOR BAT THE TRICOLORED BAT, OR
THE EASTERN SMALL–FOOTED BAT.
(B) THE SECRETARY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT AND
ENFORCE THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 5 –